Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1406.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [168A.1502] INSURER APPLICATION FOR TITLE. new text end new text begin (a) When an insurer licensed to conduct business in Minnesota acquires ownership of a vehicle through payment of damages and the owner fails to deliver the vehicle's title to the insurer within 15 days of payment of the claim, the insurer or a designated agent may apply to the commissioner for a certificate of title, salvage title, or prior salvage title as provided in this section. This section only applies to vehicles with a title issued by this state. new text end new text begin (b) At least 15 days prior to applying for a certificate of title, salvage title, or prior salvage title under this section, the insurer or a designated agent must notify the owner and any lienholders of record of the insurer's intent to apply for a title. The notice must be sent to the last known address of the owner and any lienholders by certified mail or by a commercial delivery service that provides evidence of delivery. new text end new text begin (c) At least 15 days after notifying the owner and any lienholders under paragraph (b), the insurer may apply for a certificate of title, salvage title, or prior salvage title from the commissioner. The application must attest that the insurer or a designated agent: new text end new text begin (1) paid the claim; new text end new text begin (2) requested the title or other necessary transfer documents from the owner; and new text end new text begin (3) provided notice to the owner and any lienholders as required under paragraph (b). new text end new text begin If the insurer or a designated agent does not attest to completing the requirements under clauses (1) to (3), the commissioner must reject the application. new text end new text begin (d) Notwithstanding any outstanding liens, upon proper application, the commissioner must issue a certificate of title, salvage title, or prior salvage title in the name of the insurer. Issuance of a certificate of title, salvage title, or prior salvage title extinguishes all existing liens against the vehicle. If the vehicle is sold, the insurer or a designated agent must assign the title to the buyer, and the vehicle is transferred without any liens. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [168A.1503] REQUIREMENTS UPON UNPAID INSURANCE VEHICLE CLAIM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "salvage vehicle auction company" or "auction company" means a business, organization, or individual that sells salvage vehicles on behalf of insurers. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Notice to auction company. new text end new text begin (a) If an insurance company licensed to conduct business in Minnesota requests an auction company to take possession of a salvage vehicle that is subject to an insurance claim and the insurance company does not subsequently take ownership of the vehicle, the insurance company may direct the auction company to release the vehicle to the owner or lienholder. new text end new text begin (b) The insurance company must provide the auction company notice by commercial delivery service, email, or a proprietary electronic system accessible by both the insurance company and the auction company authorizing the auction company to release the vehicle to the vehicle's owner or lienholder. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Notice to owner or lienholder. new text end new text begin (a) Upon receiving notice from an insurance company, the auction company must send two notices a minimum of 14 days apart to the owner of the vehicle and any lienholders stating that the vehicle is available to be recovered from the auction company within 30 days of the date on which the first notice was sent. Each notice must include an invoice for any outstanding charges owed to the auction company that must be paid before the vehicle may be recovered. new text end new text begin (b) Notice under this subdivision must be sent to the address of the owner and any lienholder on record with the department by certified mail or a commercially available delivery service that provides proof of delivery. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Vehicle deemed abandoned. new text end new text begin (a) If the owner or any lienholder does not recover the vehicle within 30 days of the date on which the first notice was sent under subdivision 3, (1) the vehicle is considered abandoned, (2) the vehicle's certificate of title is deemed assigned to the auction company, and (3) without surrendering the certificate of title, the auction company may request, on a form provided by the department, that the department issue a certificate of title that is free of liens and bears a salvage or prior salvage brand. new text end new text begin (b) A request under paragraph (a) must be accompanied by a copy of (1) the notice sent by the insurance company required under subdivision 2, and (2) evidence of delivery of the notices sent to the owner and any lienholders required under subdivision 3 or evidence that the notices were undeliverable. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding any outstanding liens against the vehicle, upon receipt of any fees charged under section 168A.29, the department must issue a certificate of title that is free of liens and bears a salvage or prior salvage brand to the auction company in possession of the vehicle. new text end